hu: Ragasztó viszkozitása: Közepes; Vastag; Vékony; Egyéb
pt-BR: Viscosidade da cola: Médio; Encorpado; Ralo; Outro
es: Viscosidad del pegamento: Medio; Grueso; Fino; Otros
el: Ιξώδες κόλλας: Μέση; Παχύ; Λεπτό; Άλλο
zh-TW: 膠水黏度: 中等; 厚; 薄; 其他
sl-SI: Viskoznost lepila: Medij; Debele; Tanke; Drugo
pt-PT: Viscosidade da cola: Moagem média; Espesso; Fino; Outro
ko: 글루 점도: 중간; 띡; 얇은; 기타
ro-RO: Vâscozitatea lipiciului: Medie; Densă; Subțire; Altele
de: Kleberviskosität: Mittel; Dick; Dünn; Sonstiges
nl: Lijmviscositeit: Medium; Dik; Dun; Andere
da: Limens viskositet: Medium; Tyk; Tyndt; Andet
tr: Yapıştırıcı viskozitesi: Orta; Kalın; İnce; Diğer
hr-HR: Viskoznost ljepila: Polusuho; Gusta; Tanka; Ostalo
fi: Liiman viskositeetti: Keskimääräinen; Paksu; Ohut; Muu
ru: Вязкость клея: Средний; Толстый; Тонкий; Другой
nb: Limviskositet: Middels; Tykk; Tynn; Annet
th: ความหนืดของกาว: ปานกลาง; หนา; ผมบาง; อื่นๆ
sv: Limmets viskositet: Medium; Tjockt; Tunt; Övrigt
zh-CN: 胶水粘度: 中度; 粗; 薄; 其他
pl: Lepkość kleju: Średni; Gruby; Cienki; Inne
bg-BG: Вискозитет на лепилото: Средна; Дебела; Тънка; Други
it: Viscosità della colla: Medio; Spesso; Sottile; Altro
lt-LT: Klijų klampumas: Vidutinis; Klampus; Plonas; Kita
sk-SK: Viskozita lepidla: Stredný; Hustý; Tenký; Iné
fr: Viscosité de la colle: Moyen; Épais; Fin; Autre
cs: Viskozita lepidla: Střední; Silnější; Tenčí; Jiné
en: Glue viscosity: Medium; Thick; Thin; Other
ja: 接着剤粘度: 中挽き; 厚みのある; 薄い; その他
vi: Độ nhớt keo: Vừa; Dày; Mỏng; Khác